Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Division 1. In General

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-8-201.
Short title.

This act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Yellowstone Park Commission Act”.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 18-2901; W.S. 1957, § 36-137.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Administration of Law in Yellowstone National Park,” see 14 Wyo. L.J. 9 (1959).

§ 36-8-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

], the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

The term “commission” shall mean the Wyoming Yellowstone Park commission, created by section 4 of this act [§

36-8-203

], or, if said commission shall be abolished, the board, body or authority succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given by this act to the commission shall be given by law;

“Recreational area and facilities” shall mean and embrace all of the area and facilities of the commission in Yellowstone National Park constructed or acquired by lease, license, agreement or purchase, including but not limited to cabins, lodges, hotels, restaurants, commissaries, and any other revenue producing facilities in the recreational area;

“Project” shall be deemed to mean collectively the acquisition or leasing of the recreational area and facilities, the acquisition or the construction of any buildings or other works, together with any incidental approaches, structures, facilities and property reasonably necessary and useful in order to provide new or improved recreational facilities in the recreational area;

The term “bonds” shall mean the bonds, notes, temporary bonds, interim receipts or other obligations issued by the commission pursuant to this act;

The term “revenues” shall mean all rates, rentals, admission fees, charges and other income derived from the operation of the project by the commission;

The term “cost” as applied to a project shall include, without being limited to, the cost of acquisition of the project, the cost of construction, the cost of acquisition, leasing or licensing of all land, rights-in-land, property rights, easements and interests by the commission for such construction, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, leased or licensed, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and for a reasonable period thereafter, cost of estimates and of engineering and legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing and acquiring, leasing or licensing the project, administrative expense, and such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the construction and acquisition of the project, the financing of such construction and acquisition and the placing of the project in operation. Any moneys appropriated by the state for the purpose of the commission and required to be reimbursed by it shall be considered as a part of the cost of the project and shall be reimbursed to the state out of the proceeds of the bonds issued for the project.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 18-2902; W.S. 1957, § 36-138.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 36-8-203.
Creation; composition; qualification; appointment; terms and removal of members; election of officers; quorum; compensation and expenses.

There is created an agency and instrumentality of the state to be known as the “Wyoming Yellowstone Park commission” and by that name the commission may sue and be sued and plead and be impleaded. The exercise by the commission of the powers conferred by this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] is an essential governmental function of the state. However, the performance of such governmental functions shall not be construed to relieve the commission from liability for personal injuries or property damages incurred by it through its negligence or the negligence of its servants or agents.

The commission shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor, by and with the consent of the senate. The members shall be residents of the state and qualified electors therein for a period of at least one (1) year next preceding their appointment. The successor of each member shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. Members are eligible for reappointment. The governor may remove members of the commission as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The commission shall elect one (1) of the members as chairman, another as vice-chairman and another as secretary and treasurer. Three (3) members of the commission constitute a quorum and the vote of three (3) members is necessary for any action taken by the commission. No vacancy in the membership of the commission impairs the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the commission.

The members of the commission shall not receive any compensation for their services, but when actually engaged in the performance of their duties, they shall be paid a per diem for each day of actual service and be reimbursed for their travel expense at the same rate applicable to travel expenses of other state officers. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this act shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this act or otherwise previously appropriated to the commission, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the commission beyond the extent to which monies have been provided under the authority of this act or otherwise previously appropriated.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 18-2904; W.S. 1957, § 36-139; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

Cross references. —

For power of commission to sue and be sued, see § 36-8-205(a)(iv).

As to per diem and travel expenses for state officers, see §

9-3-102

.

§ 36-8-204.
Officers, agents and employees.

The commission may select and appoint such officers, agents and employees as it may deem proper. All such officers, agents and employees shall have such powers and duties, shall hold office for such term and be subject to removal in such manner, and shall receive such compensation as the commission shall prescribe and determine.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 18-2905; W.S. 1957, § 36-140.

§ 36-8-205.
General powers.

The commission is hereby authorized and empowered:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain a principal office and suboffice at such place or places within the state as it may designate;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded;

To acquire, lease, license, construct, improve, extend, reconstruct, maintain, repair and operate the project (as herein defined);

To borrow money, make and issue negotiable notes, bonds, refunding bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness or obligations (herein called “bonds”) of the commission for any of its authorized purposes, and to secure the payment of such bonds, or any part thereof, by pledge of all or any of its revenues, and to make such agreements with the purchasers or holders of such bonds, or with others in connection with any such bonds, whether issued or to be issued, as the commission shall deem advisable, and in general, to provide for the security for said bonds and the rights of the holders thereof;

To fix, alter, charge and collect rates, rentals, admission fees and other charges for the use of the recreational area and facilities of the project and the services rendered in connection therewith at reasonable and uniform rates, to be determined exclusively by it, for the purpose of providing for the payment of the expenses of the commission, the acquisition, leasing, licensing, construction, improvement, extension, reconstruction, maintenance, repair and operation of the project, the payment of the principal of and interest on its bonds, and to fulfill the terms and provisions of any agreements made with the purchasers or holders of any of its bonds;

To acquire, purchase, hold, use, lease, license, sell, transfer and dispose of any franchise, property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, necessary or desirable for carrying out the purpose of the commission;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incident to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers and duties under this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

], including contracts, agreements or leases with the United States of America, or any officer or agency thereof, relating to the operation of the commission within the area of Yellowstone National Park and containing such terms and conditions as the commission may deem necessary or desirable, and to employ such management consultants, consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction, appraisal and financial experts, and such other experts, employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and, subject to the provisions of this act, to fix their compensation;

To accept gifts, grants, loans, contributions or subsidies from the United States of America, the state, or any agency or instrumentality of either of them, or any individual, person, firm or corporation, and to expend the proceeds thereof for any purpose of the commission; and

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this act.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 18-2906; W.S. 1957, § 36-141.

Cross references. —

As to creation of commission as agency empowered to sue and be sued, see § 36-8-203(a).

As to moneys deemed to be held in trust, see §

36-8-236

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 36-8-206.
Exercise of powers.

The exercise of the powers granted by this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the operation and maintenance of the project by the commission will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions the commission shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any project or any property acquired or used by the commission under the provision of this act or upon the income therefrom, and the bonds issued under the provisions of this act, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation within the state.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 18-2911; W.S. 1957, § 36-142.

§ 36-8-207.
Authority to maintain and operate program.

In order to maintain and operate a recreational area and facilities program in Yellowstone National Park, the Wyoming Yellowstone Park commission (hereinbefore created) is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire, lease, license, improve, extend, reconstruct, maintain, repair and operate said project (as herein defined), and to issue revenue bonds of the commission payable solely from revenues and funds of the commission, to pay the cost of the project.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 18-2903; W.S. 1957, § 36-143.

§ 36-8-208.
Consent of legislature necessary to execute contract.

Provided, however, that before the commission shall execute any contract for the purchase or make any payment for the acquisition of Yellowstone Park recreational areas and facilities, the consent of the Wyoming state legislature shall be first obtained by statute to be hereafter enacted, amending and reenacting this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

].

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 21; C.S. 1945, § 18-2921; W.S. 1957, § 36-144.

§ 36-8-209.
Revolving account.

There is hereby appropriated and credited to a special revolving account to be set up in the state treasury, to be known as the “Wyoming Yellowstone Park commission revolving account”, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00). Moneys shall be released from said account to the commission for the purpose of studying the feasibility of acquiring and leasing the project and the retaining of necessary consulting engineers, financial consultants, attorneys, appraisers, and other services deemed necessary to complete the study of the project and to determine its feasibility from an economic and financial standpoint. Any sums so advanced out of said revolving account for such purposes shall be repaid to said account without interest to the extent of such advance upon the sale of bonds for the project and the amount of any advances from said account shall be included as a part of the cost of the project.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 20; C.S. 1945, § 18-2920; W.S. 1957, § 36-145; Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “account” for “fund” throughout.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 36-8-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 149, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 22, provided for a legislative committee to study potential contracts and purchases for the acquisition of Yellowstone Park recreational areas and facilities.

§ 36-8-211.
Construction of provisions.

This act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

], being necessary for the welfare of the state and its habitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 18-2917; W.S. 1957, § 36-147.

Severability. —

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 18, reads: “The provisions of this act are severable, and if any provision or provisions hereof or of the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall be held to be invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions of this act.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 19, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.